Hawaii statutes.
[§350-1.6] Disclosure of records.
(a) The department shall disclose to resource parents and the foster child's
principal treating physician copies of the foster child's complete medical
records in the department's physical custody and relevant social history within
thirty days of foster placement.

(b) If a child is active in the child
protective services system, physicians may share with other physicians, orally
or in writing, or both, medical information without parental consent.

(c) Any records or information released to a
foster child's resource parents, or the foster child's principal treating
physician pursuant to subsection (a), or any information shared by one
physician with another physician pursuant to subsection (b), shall remain
confidential in accordance with section 350-1.4. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next